Utah statutes.
78B-1-142.   Witnesses -- Oaths -- Who may administer.
Every court, every judge, clerk and deputy clerk of any court, every justice,
every notary public, and every officer or person authorized to take testimony
in any action or proceeding, or to decide upon evidence, has the power to
administer oaths or affirmations.
